South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5179.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: School mapping data SECTION 1.    Article 1, Chapter 101, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-101-440.    (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "School mapping data" means information collected pursuant to this section in an electronic or a digital format and provided to assist first responders in responding to emergencies in an institution of higher learning. (2) "Institution of higher learning" is defined pursuant to Section 59-103-5. (B)(1) To facilitate efficient emergency responses in institutions of higher learning by public safety agencies in this State, the School Mapping Data Program is established as a statewide initiative within the State Law Enforcement Division (SLED). Subject to funding, SLED shall contract with a vendor to provide school mapping data for each institution of higher learning in the State. The data must be provided to the institution, local law enforcement agencies, and public safety agencies for use in response to emergencies. For purposes of this section, emergencies include, but are not limited to, any event in which a law enforcement officer, firefighter, rescue squad, emergency medical service provider, public safety telecommunicator, or any other emergency management provider may respond. (2) In addition to requirements set forth by SLED and in consultation with the Center for School Safety and Targeted Violence within SLED, school mapping data must: (a) be compatible with software platforms used by local, county, state, and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the specific institution of higher learning for which the data is provided without requiring such agencies to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access the data; (b) be compatible with security software platforms in use by the specific institution for which the data is provided without requiring the local law enforcement agencies or institutions to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access the data; and (c) provide that any updates to school mapping data as defined by this section must be accessible within software platforms used by local, county, state, and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the specific institution. (3) To ensure that campus mapping data used by law enforcement and emergency response agencies remains accurate and current, each public institution of higher learning shall, at least once every two years, review all campus facilities and infrastructure, including athletic facilities and branch campuses, to identify material changes, renovations, additions, or updates and shall report such changes to the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division and the mapping vendor under contract pursuant to this section, provided that nothing herein prohibits more frequent coordination or updates as necessary. (C) School mapping data provided to institutions, local law enforcement agencies, and public safety agencies for use in response to emergencies pursuant to this section must be regarded as confidential information. A private security provider used by a public institution of higher learning to provide campus security may not disclose such information except pursuant to a court order. A public body in possession of such information: (1) may not disclose such information pursuant to a request under the South Carolina Freedom of Information Act; and (2) only may disclose such information pursuant to the procedures established in Section 23-50-45. (D) In any given fiscal year and subject to available dedicated funding after the initial contract period, the State Law Enforcement Division shall be responsible for the annual cost of maintenance, which may not exceed fifteen percent of the initial cost of the mapping. Public institution of higher learning employee business disclosures SECTION 2.    Chapter 101, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-101-700.    (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Employee" means any individual employed by an institution of higher education on a full-time, part-time, temporary, or contractual basis. (2) "Business with which he is associated" means any business, trade, profession, membership, appointment, elected position or other commercial activity conducted for compensation by an employee other than the employee's official duties with the institution. (B) Every public institution of higher learning, as defined in Section 59-103-5, shall establish and maintain a secure, electronic reporting system for each employee to annually disclose any business with which he is associated. (C) On or before December thirty-first of each year, every employee shall submit a disclosure through the reporting system listing: (1) any business with which he is associated; (2) the name of the business; and (3) a general description of the type of work or services performed for the business. (D) Each institution shall ensure that the reporting system maintains the confidentiality and security of all submitted information. (E) An institution shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to implement and enforce the requirements of this section, including provisions addressing noncompliance. A copy of those policies and procedures shall be provided to the Chairman of the House Education and Public Works Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Education Committee upon adoption and upon any subsequent amendments. (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an employee from engaging in any outside business activities unless otherwise restricted by state law or institutional policy. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________